Oklahoma, session 2026, SB2056.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 2-503.1j, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 2-503.1j. A. Any licensee of a money transmission,


transmitter, or wire transmitter business pursuant to the Oklahoma


Financial Transaction Reporting Act and their delegates shall


collect a fee of Five Dollars ($5.00) Ten Dollars ($10.00) for each


transaction not in excess of Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) and in


addition to such fee an amount equal to one percent (1%) three


percent (3%) of the amount in excess of Five Hundred Dollars


($500.00).


B. The fee prescribed by subsection A of this section shall be


remitted quarterly to the Oklahoma Tax Commission on such forms as

Req. No. 3431 Page 1


the Tax Commission, with the assistance of the Oklahoma State Bureau


of Narcotics and Dangerous Drugs Control, may prescribe for such


purpose. All required forms and remittances shall be filed with the


Tax Commission not later than the fifteenth day of the month


following the close of each calendar quarter.


C. The Oklahoma Tax Commission shall apportion all revenues


derived from the fee to the Drug Money Laundering and Wire


Transmitter Revolving Fund.


D. Every licensee and their delegates shall post a notice on a


form prescribed by the Director of the Oklahoma State Bureau of


Narcotics and Dangerous Drugs Control that notifies customers that


upon filing an individual income tax return with either a valid


social security number or a valid taxpayer identification number the


customer shall be entitled to an income tax credit equal to the


amount of the fee paid by the customer for the transaction.


E. The Oklahoma Tax Commission shall be afforded all provisions


currently under law to enforce the provisions of subsection B of


this section. If a licensee fails to file reports or fails to remit


the fee authorized by subsection B A of this section, the Oklahoma


Tax Commission shall have the authority pursuant to Section 212 of


Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes to suspend the license of the


licensee and its delegates. A notification of the suspension shall


also be sent to the State Banking Commissioner and the Director of


the Oklahoma State Bureau of Narcotics and Dangerous Drugs Control.

Req. No. 3431 Page 2


The licensee and its delegates may not reapply for a license until


all required reports have been filed and all required fee amounts


have been remitted.


F. Upon request from the Oklahoma Tax Commission, the State


Banking Commissioner may make a claim against the surety bond of the


licensee on behalf of the State of Oklahoma this state.


G. The Oklahoma State Bureau of Narcotics and Dangerous Drugs


Control and its attorneys may assist the Oklahoma Tax Commission in


conducting audits and the prosecution and/or or seeking of legal


remedies to ensure compliance with this act the Drug Money


Laundering and Wire Transmitter Act.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 2357.401, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 2357.401. A. Except as otherwise provided by


subsections B and C of this section, for taxable years beginning


January 1, 2009, and ending before January 1, 2017 tax years 2009


through 2016 and 2027 and subsequent tax years, there shall be


allowed a credit against the tax imposed pursuant to Section 2355 of


this title in the amount of all electronic funds transfers fees paid


by an individual or entity pursuant to Section 2-503.1j of Title 63


of the Oklahoma Statutes.


B. For any fees paid by a person or entity for the taxable year


beginning January 1, 2009, the credit otherwise authorized by this


section shall not be claimed for an individual prior to January 1,

Req. No. 3431 Page 3


2011. Subject to the requirements of this subsection, an individual


taxpayer shall be able to claim the credit authorized by this


section for all fees paid during the tax year ending December 31,


2009, and the tax year ending December 31, 2010, on the income tax


return filed for the tax year ending December 31, 2010.


C. For any fees paid by an entity other than a natural person


for the taxable year beginning January 1, 2009, the credit otherwise


authorized by this section shall not be claimed on an income tax


return prior to January 1, 2011. Subject to the requirements of


this subsection, an entity other than a natural person shall be able


to claim the credit authorized by this section for all fees paid


during a tax year ending at any time during calendar year 2009 and


for all fees paid during calendar year 2010 on the income tax return


filed for the tax year ending not later than December 31, 2010.


D. The credit authorized by this section shall not be used to


reduce the income tax liability of the taxpayer to less than zero


(0).


E. To the extent not used in any taxable year, the credit


authorized by this section may be carried over, in order, to each of


the five (5) succeeding taxable years.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3431 QD 1/15/2026 11:20:23 AM



Req. No. 3431 Page 4